Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.357

Child and adolescent psychiatry residency—Creation, requirements.

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, Washington State University shall offer two twenty-four month residency positions that are approved by the accreditation council for graduate medical education to two residents specializing in child and adolescent psychiatry. The positions must each include a minimum of eighteen months of training in settings where children's mental health services are provided under the supervision of experienced psychiatric consultants and must be located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.

[ 2019 c 360 s 4; 2017 c 202 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 360 s 4: "Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1, 2020." [ 2019 c 360 s 9.]

Findings—Intent—2019 c 360: See note following RCW 74.09.4951.

Findings—Intent—2017 c 202: See note following RCW 74.09.495.